District of Columbia statutes.
31-5605.05

Unlawful representations concerning licensing, registration, notice filing, or exemption.

(a)

The filing of an application for a registration or notice filing under subchapter II, the filing of a registration statement or notice filing under subchapter III, or registration of a person or security shall not constitute a finding by the Commissioner that any document filed under this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading. Such filings, licensure, or registration, or that an exemption or exception is available for a security or a transaction, shall not mean the Commissioner has passed upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, a person, security, or transaction.

(b)

A person shall not make, or cause to be made, to a prospective purchaser, customer, or client a representation inconsistent with subsection (a) of this section.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 505, 47 DCR 7837
This section is referenced in § 31-5606.04, § 31-5606.05, and § 31-5608.01.